Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.076

Proof of contribution made by deceased victim.

A beneficiary shall at all times furnish the department with proof satisfactory to the director of the nature, amount, and extent of the contribution made by the deceased victim.

[ 2011 c 346 s 407.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.